Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2103.   Services between procurement units.

(1)  Upon request, a procurement unit may make services available to another procurement unit, including:

(a)  standard forms;

(b)  printed manuals;

(c)  qualified products lists;

(d)  source information;

(e)  common use commodities listings;

(f)  supplier prequalification information;

(g)  supplier performance ratings;

(h)  debarred and suspended bidders lists;

(i)  forms for invitation for bids, requests for proposals, instructions to bidders, general contract provisions, and contract forms; or

(j)  contracts or published summaries of contracts, including price and time of delivery information.

(2)  A procurement unit may provide technical services to another procurement unit, including:

(a)  development of specifications;

(b)  development of quality assurance test methods, including receiving, inspection, and acceptance procedures;

(c)  use of testing and inspection facilities; or

(d)  use of personnel training programs.

(3) Procurement units may enter into contractual arrangements and publish a schedule of fees for the services provided under Subsections (1) and (2).



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

